District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
resolution may be cited as the “Uniform College Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness
Congressional Review Emergency Declaration Resolution of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) On May 6, 2025, the Council adopted the Uniform College Athlete Name,
Image, or Likeness Emergency Amendment Act of 2025, effective May 19, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-
69; 72 DCR 6112), which will expire on August 17, 2025.
(b) On June 3, 2025, the Council adopted the Uniform College Athlete Name, Image, or
Likeness Temporary Amendment Act of 2025, enacted on June 25, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-93; 72
DCR 7559) (“temporary act”), which has not completed congressional review.
(c) Identical emergency legislation is necessary to prevent a gap in the law between the
expiration of the emergency act and the effective date of the temporary act.
Sec. 3. The Council of the District of Columbia determines that the circumstances
enumerated in section 2 constitute emergency circumstances making it necessary that the
Uniform College Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Congressional Review Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025 be adopted after a single reading.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.